North Dakota statutes. TITLE 10 Corporations
CHAPTER 10-32.1 Uniform Limited Liability Company Act

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-01.
Citation.

This chapter may be cited as the “North Dakota Uniform Limited Liability Company Act”.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-02.
Definitions.

For purposes of this chapter, unless the context otherwise requires:

“Acquiring organization” means the domestic or foreign organization that acquires the ownership interests of another foreign or domestic organization in an exchange.

“Address” means:

In the case of a registered office or principal executive office, the mailing address, which may not be only a post-office box, including a zip code, or the actual office location; and

In all other cases, the mailing address, including a zip code.

“Board” means the board of governors, however designated, of a board-managed limited liability company.

“Board-managed limited liability company” means a limited liability company that qualifies as such under subsection 1 of section 10-32.1-39.

“Bylaws” means any rule, resolution, or other provision, regardless how designated, that:

Relates to the management of the business or the regulation of the affairs of the limited liability company; and

Was expressly part of the bylaws by the action, taken from time to time under section 10-32.1-39 by the board or the members.

“Class”, when used with reference to membership interests, means a category of membership interests which differs in one or more rights or preferences from another category of membership interests of the limited liability company.

“Closely held limited liability company” means a limited liability company that does not have more than thirty-five members.

“Contribution” means any benefit provided by a person to a limited liability company:

In order to become a member upon formation of the company and in accordance with an agreement between or among the persons that have agreed to become the initial members of the company;

In order to become a member after formation of the company and in accordance with an agreement between the person and the company; or

In the capacity of the person as a member and in accordance with the operating agreement or an agreement between the member and the company.

“Corporation” or “domestic corporation” means a corporation, other than a foreign corporation, organized for profit and incorporated under chapter 10-19.1.

“Debtor in bankruptcy” means a person that is the subject of:

An order for relief under United States Code, title 12, or a successor statute of general application; or

A comparable order under federal, state, or foreign law governing insolvency.

“Dissolution” means that the limited liability company incurred an event under subsection 1 of section 10-32.1-50 that obligates the limited liability company to wind up the affairs of the limited liability company and to terminate the existence of the limited liability company as a legal entity.

“Distribution”, except as otherwise provided in subsection 7 of section 10-32.1-31, means a transfer of money or other property from a limited liability company to another person on account of a transferable interest.

“Effective”, with respect to a record required or permitted to be filed with the secretary of state under this chapter, means effective under subsection 3 of section 10-32.1-86.

“Electronic” means relating to technology having electrical, digital, magnetic, wireless, optical, electromagnetic, or similar capabilities.

“Electronic communication” means any form of communication, not directly involving the physical transmission of paper:

That creates a record that may be retained, retrieved, and reviewed by a recipient of the communication; or

That may be directly reproduced in paper form by the recipient through an automated process.

“Electronic record” means a record created, generated, sent, communicated, received, or stored by electronic means.

“Electronic signature” means an electronic sound, symbol, or process attached to or logically associated with a record and executed or adopted by a person with the intent to sign the record.

“Filed documents” means:

In the case of a limited liability company organized under this chapter, articles of organization, articles of amendment, a statement of correction, restated articles of organization, a statement of change of registered office, registered agent, or name of registered agent, a statement establishing or fixing the rights and preferences of a class or series of membership interests, articles of merger, articles of abandonment, articles of conversion, articles of domestication, statement of authority or a statement amending or canceling a statement of authority, and articles of dissolution and termination.

In the case of a foreign limited liability company, the term includes all records serving a similar function required to be filed with the secretary of state or other state office of the state of organization of the foreign limited liability company.

“Filed with the secretary of state” means except as otherwise permitted by law or rule:

That a record meeting the applicable requirements of this chapter, together with the fees provided in section 10-32.1-92, has been delivered or communicated to the secretary of state by a method or medium of communication acceptable by the secretary of state, and has been determined by the secretary of state to conform to law.

That the secretary of state did then:

Record the actual date on which the record was filed, and if different, the effective date of the filing which may not be later than ninety days after the date on which the record was accepted; and

Record the record in the office of the secretary of state.

“Foreign corporation” means a corporation organized for profit that is incorporated under laws other than the laws of this state for a purpose for which a corporation may be incorporated under chapter 10-19.1.

“Foreign limited liability company” means a limited liability company which is organized under or governed by laws other than the laws of this state for a purpose for which a limited liability company may be organized under this chapter.

“Foreign organization” means an organization created under laws other than the laws of this state for a purpose for which an organization may be created under the laws of this state.

“Good faith” means honesty in fact in the conduct of the act or transaction concerned.

“Governing body” means for an organization that is:

A corporation, its board of directors;

A limited liability company that is:

Member-managed, its members;

Board-managed, its board of governors; or

Manager-managed, its managers; or

Any other organization, the body selected by its owners that has the ultimate power to determine the policies of the organization and to control its policies.

“Governor” means a member of the board, however designated, of a board-managed limited liability company.

“Intentionally” means that the person referred to either has a purpose to do or fail to do the act or cause the result specified or believes that the act or failure to act, if successful, will cause that result and as such a person “intentionally” violates a statute:

If the personal intentionally does the act or causes the result prohibited by the statute; or

If the person intentionally fails to do the act or cause the result required by the statute, even though the person may not know of the existence or constitutionality of the statute or the scope or meaning of the terms used in the statute.

“Legal representative” means a person empowered to act for another person, including an agent, manager, officer, partner, or associate of an organization; a trustee of a trust; a personal representative; a trustee in bankruptcy; and a receiver, guardian, custodian, or conservator.

“Limited liability company”, or “domestic limited liability company” means a limited liability company, other than a foreign limited liability company, organized under or governed by this chapter excluding a nonprofit limited liability company organized under or governed by chapter 10-36.

“Manager” means an individual who is eighteen years of age or more who under the operating agreement of a manager-managed limited liability company is responsible, alone or in concert with others, for performing the management functions stated in subsection 3 of section 10-32.1-39.

“Manager-managed limited liability company” means a limited liability company that qualifies as such under subsection 1 of section 10-32.1-39.

“Member” means a person that has become a member of a limited liability company under section 10-32.1-27 and has not dissociated under section 10-32.1-48.

“Membership interest” means one of the units, however designated, of which the proprietary interests of a member in a limited liability company is divided.

“Member-managed limited liability company” means a limited liability company that is not a manager-managed limited liability company or a board-managed limited liability company.

“Nonprofit limited liability company” means a limited liability company organized under or governed by chapter 10-36.

“Notice” has the meaning provided in section 10-32.1-04.

“Operating agreement” means the agreement, whether or not referred to as an operating agreement and whether oral, in a record, implied, or in any combination thereof, of all the members of a limited liability company, including a sole member, concerning the matters described in subsection 1 of section 10-32.1-13 and includes the operating agreement as amended or restated.

With respect to “oppressive”:

“Oppressive”, with respect to an application brought by a member under paragraph 2 of subdivision 3 of subsection 1 of section 10-32.1-50, means conduct:

Engaged in by one or more:

Members in a member-managed limited liability company or who are otherwise in control of any limited liability company;

Managers in a manager-managed limited liability company; or

Governors of a board-managed limited liability company;

That occurs with respect to the capacity of the applicant member as:

A member, manager, or governor of a limited liability company; or

An employee of a limited liability company with thirty-five or fewer members; and

That is unfairly prejudicial to the applicant member in a capacity listed in subdivision b, because the conduct frustrated an expectation of the applicant member that:

Is reasonable in light of the reasonable expectations of the other members;

Was material to the decision of the applicant to become a member of the limited liability company or for a substantial time has been material during the continuing membership of the member;

Was known to other members or that the other members had reason to know; and

Is not contrary to the operating agreement as applied consistently with the contractual obligation of good faith and fair dealing under subsection 4 of section 10-32.1-41.

For the purposes of subdivision a, conduct:

Includes words, action, inaction, and any combination of words, action, or inaction; and

Is not oppressive solely by reason of a good faith disagreement as to the content, interpretation, or application of the operating agreement of the company.

“Organization”:

Means, whether domestic or foreign, a limited liability company, corporation, general partnership, limited partnership, limited liability partnership, limited liability limited partnership, or any other person having a governing statute; but

Excludes:

Any nonprofit corporation, whether a domestic nonprofit corporation which is incorporated under chapter 10-33 or a foreign nonprofit corporation which is incorporated in another jurisdiction; or

Any nonprofit limited liability company, whether a domestic nonprofit limited liability company which is organized under chapter 10-36 or a foreign nonprofit limited liability company which is organized in another jurisdiction.

“Organizer” means a person that acts under section 10-32.1-20 to form a limited liability company.

“Originating records” means for an organization which is:

A corporation, its articles of incorporation;

A limited liability company, its articles of organization;

A limited partnership, its certificate of limited partnership;

A limited liability partnership, its registration; or

A limited liability limited partnership, its certificate of limited liability limited partnership.

“Owners” means the holders of ownership interests in an organization.

“Ownership interests” means for a domestic or foreign organization that is:

A corporation, its shares;

A limited liability company, its transferable interests;

A limited partnership, its partnership interests or transferable interests;

A general partnership, its partnership interests or transferable interests;

A limited liability partnership, its partnership interests or transferable interests;

A limited liability limited partnership, its partnership interests or transferable interests; or

Any other organization, its governance or transferable interests.

“Principal executive office” means:

If the limited liability company has an elected or appointed president, then an office where the elected or appointed president of the limited liability company has an office; or

If the limited liability company has no elected or appointed president, then the registered office of the limited liability company.

“Record” means information that is inscribed on a tangible medium or that is stored in an electronic or other medium and is retrievable in perceivable form.

“Recorded in the real property records” means that a certified copy of a record meeting the applicable requirements of this chapter, including containing a legal description of the property affected by the record, as filed with the secretary of state, has been recorded in the office of the county recorder in the county in which the real property affected by the record is located.

“Registered office” means:

The office that a limited liability company is required to designate and maintain under section 10-32.1-16; or

The office that a foreign limited liability company is required to designate and maintain under section 10-32.1-78.

“Remote communication” means communication via electronic communication, conference telephone, videoconference, the internet, or other means by which persons not physically present in the same location may communicate with each other on a substantially simultaneous basis.

“Series” means a category of membership interests, within a class of membership interests, that has some of the same rights and preferences as other membership interests within the same class, but that differ in one or more rights and preferences from another category of membership interests within that class.

“Sign” or “Signed” means:

That the signature of a person, which may be a facsimile affixed, engraved, printed, placed, stamped with indelible ink, transmitted by facsimile telecommunication or electronically, or in any other manner reproduced on the record, is placed on a record with the present intention to authenticate that record.

With respect to a record required by this chapter to be filed with the secretary of state, that:

The record has been signed by a person authorized to do so by this chapter, the articles or organization, a member-control agreement, or the bylaws or a resolution approved by the governors as required by section 10-32.1-39 or the members as required by section 10-32.1-39; and

The signature and the record are communicated by a method or medium acceptable by the secretary of state.

The initial articles of organization must be signed by at least one person acting as an organizer.

A record filed on behalf of a dissolved limited liability company that has no members must be signed:

By the person winding up the activities of the company under subsection 3 of section 10-31.2-51; or

By a person appointed under subsection 4 of section 10-32.1-51, to wind up those activities.

A statement of denial by a person under section 10-32.1-25 must be signed by that person.

Any other record filed under this chapter may be signed by an agent pursuant to chapters 3-01, 3-02, 3-03, and 3-04.

“State” means a state of the United States, the District of Columbia, Puerto Rico, the United States Virgin Islands, or any territory or insular possession subject to the jurisdiction of the United States.

“Termination” means the end of the existence of a limited liability company as a legal entity and occurs when:

Articles of dissolution and termination are filed with the secretary of state under section 10-32.1-51 together with the fees provided in section 10-32.1-92.

Articles of dissolution and termination are considered filed with the secretary of state under subsection 3 of section 10-32.1-59, together with the fees provided in section 10-32.1-92.

Notice of termination has been issued by the secretary of state as provided in section 10-32.1-90.

“Transfer” includes an assignment, conveyance, deed, bill of sale, lease, mortgage, security interest, encumbrance, gift, and transfer by operation of law.

“Transferable interest” or “membership interest” means the right, as originally associated with the capacity of a person as a member, to receive distributions from a limited liability company in accordance with the operating agreement, whether or not the person remains a member or continues to own any part of the right.

“Transferee” means a person to which all or part of a transferable interest has been transferred, whether or not the transferor is a member.

“Vote” includes authorization by written action.

“Winding up” means the period triggered by dissolution during which the limited liability company ceases to carry on business, except to the extent necessary for concluding affairs, and disposing of assets under section 10-32.1-51.

“Written action” means:

A written record signed by every person required to take the action described; and

The counterparts of a written record signed by any person taking the action described.

Each counterpart constitutes the action of the persons signing it; and

All the counterparts, taken together, constitute one written action by all of the persons signing them.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-03.
Legal recognition of electronic records and electronic signatures.

For purposes of this chapter:

A record or signature may not be denied legal effect or enforceability solely because it is in electronic form;

A contract may not be denied legal effect or enforceability solely because an electronic record was used in its formation;

If a provision requires a record to be in writing, then an electronic record satisfies the requirement; and

If a provision requires a signature, then an electronic signature satisfies the requirement.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-04.
Knowledge and notice.

A person knows a fact when the person:

Has actual knowledge of it; or

Is deemed to know it under subdivision a of subsection 4, or law other than this chapter.

A person has notice of a fact when the person:

Has reason to know the fact from all of the facts known to the person at the time in question; or

Is deemed to have notice of the fact under subdivision b of subsection 4.

A person notifies another of a fact by taking steps reasonably required to inform the other person in ordinary course, whether or not the other person knows the fact.

A person that is not a member is deemed:

To know of a limitation on authority to transfer real property as provided in subsection 7 of section 10-32.1-24; and

To have notice of:

The dissolution of a limited liability company, ninety days after a notice of dissolution under paragraph 1 of subdivision b of subsection 2 of section 10-32.1-51, becomes effective;

The termination of a limited liability company, ninety days after the articles of dissolution and termination under paragraph 6 of subdivision b of subsection 2 of section 10-32.1-51, becomes effective; and

The merger, conversion, or domestication of a limited liability company, ninety days after the articles of merger, conversion, or domestication under sections 10-32.1-67 through 10-32.1-71 becomes effective.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-05.
Application to existing relationships.

On or after July 1, 2015, a limited liability company may not be formed under chapter 10-32.

Before January 1, 2016, this chapter governs only:

A limited liability company formed on or after July 1, 2015; and

Except as otherwise provided in subsection 3, a limited liability company formed before July 1, 2015, which elects, in the manner provided in its articles of organization, operating agreement or bylaws for amending the operating agreement, to be subject to this chapter.

Except as otherwise provided in subsection 4, on and after January 1, 2016, this chapter governs all limited liability companies.

For the purposes of applying this chapter to a limited liability company formed before July 1, 2015:

The articles of organization of the limited liability company under chapter 10-32 at the time the limited liability company becomes subject to this chapter are deemed to be the articles of organization of the limited liability company; and

For the purposes of applying subsection 35 of section 10-32.1-02, and subject to subsection 4 of section 10-32.1-15, the language in the articles of organization, and any bylaws, operating agreement, or member control agreement, or any combination of those documents of a limited liability company formed before July 1, 2015, that becomes subject to this chapter will operate as if that language were in the operating agreement of the limited liability company when it becomes subject to this chapter; and

Subject to the operating agreement of the limited liability company:

The limited liability company shall keep the records specified in subdivision k of subsection 1 of section 10-32-51, at the principal executive office of the limited liability company, or at another place or places within the United States as determined under subsection 1 of section 10-32-51, before the limited liability company became subject to this chapter;

For the purpose of applying paragraph 1, subsections 3 and 4 of section 10-32-56, continue to apply to the limited liability company as if those provisions had not been repealed;

Subsection 1 of section 10-32.1-30, does not apply to the limited liability company;

The profits and losses of the limited liability company are to be allocated among the members, and among classes and series of members, in proportion to the value of the contributions of the members reflected in the records required by paragraph 1;

The voting power of each membership interest is in proportion to the value of the contributions of the members reflected in the records required by paragraph 1;

Distributions of cash or other assets of the limited liability company, including distributions on the dissolution of the limited liability company, must be allocated in proportion to the value of the contributions of the members reflected in the records required by paragraph 1;

Subdivision a of subsection 1 and subsections 2 and 3 of 10-32-54 and section 10-32-55 continue to apply to the limited liability company as if those provisions had not been repealed; and

For the purpose of applying paragraph 7, subsection 1 of section 10-32-40.1 continues to apply to the limited liability company as if that provision had not been repealed.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-06.
Reservation of legislative right.

The legislative assembly reserves the right to amend or repeal the provisions of this chapter. A limited liability company organized under or governed by this chapter is subject to this reserved right.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-07.
Nature, purpose, and duration of a limited liability company.

A limited liability company is an entity distinct from its members.

Except for a nonprofit limited liability company subject to chapter 10-36, which must comply with that chapter, a limited liability company may have any lawful purpose.

A limited liability company has perpetual duration unless stated otherwise in articles of organization filed with the secretary of state prior to July 1, 2015.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-08.
Powers.

Except as provided in subsection 2, a limited liability company has the capacity to sue and be sued in its own name and the power to do all things necessary or convenient to carry on its activities. With respect to loans, guarantees, and suretyship:

Without in any way limiting the generality of the power of a limited liability company to do all things necessary or convenient to carry on its activities, a limited liability company may lend money to, guarantee an obligation of, become a surety for, or otherwise financially assist a person, if the transaction, or a class of transactions to which the transaction belongs, is approved pursuant to this chapter and the operating agreement of the limited liability company, and:

Is in the usual and regular course of business of the limited liability company;

Is with, or for the benefit of, a related organization, an organization in which the limited liability company has a financial interest, an organization with which the limited liability company has a business relationship, or an organization to which the limited liability company has the power to make donations, any of which relationships constitute consideration sufficient to make the loan, guarantee, suretyship, or other financial assistance so approved enforceable against the limited liability company;

Is with, or for the benefit of, a member who provides services to the limited liability company, or a manager or other employee of the limited liability company or a subsidiary, including a member, manager, or employee who is a governor of the limited liability company or a subsidiary, and may reasonably be expected, in the judgment of the board of governors, to benefit the limited liability company; or

Whether or not any separate consideration has been paid or promised to the limited liability company, has been approved by:

The owners of two-thirds of the voting power of persons other than the interested person or persons; or

The unanimous vote of all members, whether or not ordinarily entitled to vote.

Any loan, guaranty, surety contract, or other financial assistance described in subdivision a may be with or without interest and may be unsecured or may be secured in any manner including, without limitation, a grant of a security interest in the transferable interest of a member in the limited liability company.

This subsection does not grant any authority to act as a bank or to carry on the business of banking.

Until a limited liability company has or has had at least one member, the company lacks the capacity to do any act or carry on any activity except:

Delivering to the secretary of state for filing:

A statement of change under section 10-32.1-17;

An amendment to the certificate under section 10-32.1-21;

A statement of correction under section 10-32.1-88;

An annual report under section 10-32.1-89;

A notice of termination under section 10-32.1-51; and

Articles of dissolution and termination under section 10-32.1-51;

Admitting a member under section 10-32.1-27; and

Dissolving under section 10-32.1-50.

A limited liability company that has or has had at least one member may ratify an act or activity that occurred when the company lacked capacity under subsection 2.

A limited liability company only may seek to obtain a license or permit required by the state after the articles of organization are filed with the secretary of state and the limited liability company has one or more members.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015; 2019, ch. 92, § 8, effective August 1, 2019.

10-32.1-09.
Governing law.

The law of this state governs:

The internal affairs of a limited liability company; and

The liability of a member as member, a manager as manager, and a governor as governor, for the debts, obligations, or other liabilities of a limited liability company.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-10.
Supplemental principles of law.

Unless displaced by particular provisions of this chapter, the principles of law and equity supplement this chapter.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.

10-32.1-11.
Limited liability company name. [Contingent effective date – See note]

The limited liability company name:

Must be expressed in letters or characters used in the English language as those letters or characters appear in the American standard code for information interchange table;

Must contain the words “limited liability company”, or must contain the abbreviation “L.L.C.” or the abbreviation “LLC”, either of which abbreviation may be used interchangeably for all purposes authorized by this chapter, including real estate matters, contracts, and filings with the secretary of state;

May not contain:

The word “corporation”, “incorporated”, “limited partnership”, “limited liability partnership”, “limited liability limited partnership”, or an abbreviation of these words; or

The words “limited” or “company” without association to the words “limited liability company” or the abbreviations of these words as provided in subsection b;

May not contain a word or phrase indicating or implying the limited liability company:

Is organized for a purpose other than:

A lawful business purpose for which a limited liability company may be organized under this chapter; or

For a purpose stated in its articles of organization; or

May not be organized under this chapter; and

Must be distinguishable in the records of the secretary of state from:

The name, whether foreign and authorized to do business in this state or domestic, unless there is filed with the articles a record which complies with subsection 3, of:

Another limited liability company;

A corporation;

A limited partnership;

A limited liability partnership; or

A limited liability limited partnership;

A name, the right of which is, at the time of organization, reserved in the manner provided in section 10-19.1-14, 10-32.1-12, 10-33-11, 45-10.2-11, 45-13-04.2, or 45-22-05;

A fictitious name registered in the manner provided in chapter 45-11;

A trade name registered in the manner provided in chapter 47-25; or

A trademark or service mark registered in the manner provided in chapter 47-22.

The secretary of state shall determine whether a limited liability company name is distinguishable in the secretary of state’s records from another name for purposes of this chapter and may adopt rules reasonable or necessary for making these determinations.

If the secretary of state determines a limited liability company name is indistinguishable in the secretary of state’s records from another name for purposes of this chapter, the limited liability company name may not be used unless there is filed with the articles:

The written consent of the holder of the rights to the name to which the proposed name has been determined to be indistinguishable; or

A certified copy of a judgment of a court in this state establishing the prior right of the applicant to the use of the name in this state.

This section and section 10-32.1-12 do not:

Abrogate or limit:

The law of unfair competition or unfair practices;

Chapter 47-25;

The laws of the United States with respect to the right to acquire and protect copyrights, trade names, trademarks, service names, and service marks; or

Any other rights to the exclusive use of names or symbols.

Derogate the common law or the principles of equity.

A domestic or foreign limited liability company that is the surviving organization in a merger with one or more other organizations, or that acquires by sale, lease, or other disposition to or exchange with an organization all or substantially all of the assets of another organization including its name, may have the same name, subject to the requirements of subsection 1, as that used in this state by any of the other organizations, if the organization whose name is sought to be used:

Was organized, incorporated, formed, or registered under the laws of this state;

Is authorized to transact business or conduct activities in this state;

Holds a reserved name in the manner provided in section 10-19.1-14, 10-32.1-12, 10-33-11, 45-10.2-11, 45-13-04.2, or 45-22-05;

Holds a fictitious name registered in the manner provided in chapter 45-11;

Holds a trade name registered in the manner provided in chapter 47-25; or

Holds a trademark or service mark registered in the manner provided in chapter 47-22.

The use of a name by a limited liability company in violation of this section does not affect or vitiate its limited liability company existence. However, a court in this state may, upon application of the state or of an interested or affected person, enjoin the limited liability company from doing business under a name assumed in violation of this section, although its articles of organization may have been filed with the secretary of state and a certificate of organization issued.

A limited liability company whose period of existence has expired or that is involuntarily terminated by the secretary of state pursuant to section 10-32.1-90 may reacquire the right to use that name by refiling articles of organization pursuant to section 10-32.1-20, unless the name has been adopted for use or reserved by another person, in which case the filing will be rejected unless the filing is accompanied by a written consent or judgment pursuant to subsection 3. A limited liability company that cannot reacquire the use of its limited liability company name shall adopt a new limited liability company name which complies with the provisions of this section:

By refiling the articles of organization pursuant to section 10-32.1-20;

By amending pursuant to section 10-32.1-21; or

By reinstating pursuant to section 10-32.1-91.

Subject to section 10-32.1-73, this section applies to a foreign limited liability company transacting business in this state, having a certificate of authority to transact business in this state, or applying for a certificate of authority.

An amendment that only changes the name of the limited liability company may be authorized by a resolution approved by the board and may be submitted to and approved by the members as provided in subdivision b of subsection 1 of section 10-32.1-21.

A limited liability company that files its articles of organization with an effective date later than the date of filing as provided in subdivision b of subsection 2 of section 10-32.1-20 shall maintain the right to the name until the effective date.

History.

Contingently enacted by S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015; contingently amended by 2019, ch. 93, § 3.

Note.

This section is effective upon receipt by the legislative council of the certification by the secretary of state attesting that all necessary administrative rules and information technology components and systems are ready for implementation of this Act.

10-32.1-12.
Reserved name.

The exclusive right to the use of a limited liability company name otherwise permitted by section 10-32.1-11 may be reserved by any person.

The reservation is made by filing a request with the secretary of state that the name be reserved together with the fees provided in section 10-32.1-92.

If the name is available for use by the applicant, then the secretary of state shall reserve the name for the exclusive use of the applicant for a period of twelve months.

The reservation may be renewed for successive twelve-month periods.

The right to the exclusive use of a limited liability company name reserved pursuant to this section may be transferred to another person by or on behalf of the applicant for whom the name was reserved by filing with the secretary of state a notice of the transfer and specifying the name and address of the transferee together with the fees provided in section 10-32.1-92.

The right to the exclusive use of a limited liability company name reserved pursuant to this section may be canceled by or on behalf of the applicant for whom the name was reserved by filing with the secretary of state a notice of the cancellation together with the fees provided in section 10-32.1-92.

The secretary of state may destroy all reserved name requests and index thereof one year after expiration.

History.

S.L. 2015, ch. 87, § 19, effective July 1, 2015.